Idaho, session 2026, H0978.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Public Health Services Division the following amounts to be expended accord-
ing to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. PHYSICAL HEALTH SERVICES:
FROM:
Idaho Immunization Dedicated Vaccine
Fund $28,020,000 $28,020,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $960,400 2,577,200 $3,768,800 7,306,400
TOTAL $960,400 $30,597,200 $3,768,800 $35,326,400


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. LABORATORY SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $78,400 $200,000 $278,400
III. SUICIDE PREVENTION AND AWARENESS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $3,900 $15,100 $19,000
GRAND TOTAL $1,038,800 $30,801,100 $3,783,900 $35,623,800
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public
Health Services Division for the Laboratory Services Program is hereby re-
duced by $78,400 for personnel costs from the Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public
Health Services Division for the Health Care Policy Initiatives Program is
hereby reduced by the following amounts according to the designated expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027.
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $16,300 $129,800 $146,100
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $3,200 75,000 78,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 0 16,500 237,800 254,300
TOTAL $3,200 $107,800 $367,600 $478,600


SECTION 4. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public Health Services Divi-
sion is hereby reduced by three (3.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE SUICIDE PREVENTION AND AWARENESS
PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identifying
outcomes and return on investment for moneys appropriated for the Suicide
Prevention and Awareness Program. The format and content of this report will
be determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 6. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE HIV PREVENTION AND SURVEILLANCE
PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare and the public health dis-
tricts shall submit a report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
by December 31, 2026, identifying outcomes and return on investment for
moneys appropriated for the HIV Prevention and Surveillance Program. The
format and content of this report will be determined in consultation with the
Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 7. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE HEPATITIS PREVENTION AND SURVEIL-
LANCE PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to
the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identify-
ing outcomes and return on investment for moneys appropriated for the Hep-
atitis Prevention and Surveillance Program. The format and content of this
report will be determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analy-
sis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 8. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE IMMUNIZATION ASSESSMENT FUND. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to the Joint Finance-
Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identifying the vaccine uti-
lization rate and a cost-savings analysis for the State of Idaho and ser-
vice providers regarding vaccines purchased using the Immunization Assess-
ment Fund. The format and content of this report will be determined in con-
sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 9. REQUIRING A REPORT REGARDING IMMIGRATION STATUS FOR THE HIV
PREVENTION AND SURVEILLANCE PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare
shall compile a report from the public health districts to submit to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, on the docu-
mented immigration status of individuals utilizing HIV prevention services
through the HIV Prevention and Surveillance Program. The format and content
of this report will be determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy
Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.


SECTION 10. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriati-
ons made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and
restrictions specified in this act.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.